src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/ru/hyphenation/hyph_ru.dic
.т8е8р9н8о9с8л8и9в8о8м.
.те2р1н
.терно3с2л
.тер1но
.терно2с1ли
.тернос3л2и1во
.терносливо3м2
.т8р8о8п9л8ю.
.тро3пл
.тро2пл2ю
.тро1п
.т8ь8ф8у.
.ть1
.ть1ф
.у8з8у9ф8р8у8к8т.
.у1зу
.узу2фр
.узу1ф
.узуф1ру
.узуфру2к1т
.у8м8н8е8м.
.у2м1н
.ум1не
.умне1м
.у8м8н8е8т.
.у8м8н8е8т8е.
.умне1т2е
.у8м8н8у.
.ум1ну
.у8м8р8у.
.у8с8л8ы8ш8ь9т8е.
.ус2л
.услы1
.услы3шь1
.услы1ш
.услышь1т2е
.у8ш8л8а.
.у2шл
.уш1ла
.у1ш
.ф8о9т8о9п8л8е9н8о8к.
.фо1т
.фото3п
.фото2п1лен
.фотопле1но
.фотоплено1к
.ц8а9р8е9д8в8о9р8е8ц.
.ца1
.ца1ре
.царе1дв2
.царед1во
.царедво1ре
.царедворе1ц
.ч8е9р8е8с9ч8у8р.
.че1ре
.чере1сч2
.черес1чу
.ч8е8р9н8о9с8л8и9в8о8м.
.че2р1н
.черно3с2л
.чер1но
.черно2с1ли
.чернос3л2и1во
.черносливо3м2
.ч8р8е8с8л.
.чр2е1сл
.ч8у8ж9д8о8с8т8ь.
.чу1ж
.чу2ж1д
.чуж1до3
.чуждо1с
.чуждо1ст
.чуждос4ть1
.ш8е8с8т8ь9д8е9с8я8т.
.ше1с2
.ше1ст
.шес4ть1
.шесть1де
.шестьде1ся
.ю8с8о8м.
.ю1со
.юсо3м2
.я8д8о9з8у9б8е.
.я1до
.ядо1з
.ядо1зу
.ядо2з1у2бе
.я8р8е8м9н8о9г8о.
.яре3м1но
.яре1м
.яре2м1н
.яремно1г2
